Hawaii, session 2025, GM1101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. In accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and
37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined
that the general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year
2024-2025 has already been exceeded by $8,551,795, or 1.0 per
cent. The appropriations contained in sections 2, 3, and 13 of
this Act will cause the state general fund expenditure ceiling
for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be further exceeded by $30,334,159,
or 1.0 per cent. This declaration takes into account the
additional general fund appropriations authorized for fiscal
year 2024-2025 in this Act only. The reasons for exceeding the
general fund expenditure ceiling are that:
(1) The appropriations made in this Act are necessary to
serve the public interest; and
(2) The appropriations made in this Act meet the needs
addressed by this Act.
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO 1

Page 2 H.B. NO 1440
H.D. 1
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $12,483,412 or so
much thereof as may be necessary to the senate for the following
expenses:
(1) The sum of $11,145,162 for defraying any and all
session and nonsession expenses of the senate up to
and including June 30, 2026, including the 2025
regular session, thirty-third legislature of the State
of Hawaii, and pre-session expenses and the expenses
of any committee or committees established during the
interim between the 2025 and 2026 regular sessions;
(2) The sum of $1,219,000 for defraying the expenses of
the legislative information system for cost items such
as hardware, software, consultants, installation,
materials, supplies, and other related costs
associated with the legislative information system
that have been or will be incurred; and
(3) The sum of $119,250 for defraying the cost of the
legislative broadcasting program to pay for the
production and distribution of broadcasts of
legislative proceedings, including but not limited to
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO ;

Page 3 H.B. NO. 1440
H.D. 1
television broadcast, live streaming, and internet
platforms for public access.
The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by
the senate.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $17,041,749 or so
much thereof as may be necessary to the house of representatives
for the following expenses:
The sum of $15,927,770 for defraying any and all
session and nonsession expenses of the house of
representatives up to and including June 30 2026
including the 2025 regular session. thirty-third
legislature of the State of Hawaii and pre-session
expenses and the expenses of any committee or
committees established during the interim between the
2025 and 2026 regular sessions;
(2) The sum of $994,729 for defraying the expenses of the
legislative information system for cost items such as
hardware, software, consultants, installation
materials, supplies, and other related costs
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO

Page 4 1440
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
associated with the legislative information system
that have been or will be incurred; and
(3) The sum of $119,250 for defraying the cost of the
legislative broadcasting program to pay for the
production and distribution of broadcasts of
legislative proceedings, including but not limited to
television broadcast, live streaming, and internet
platforms for public access.
The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by
the house of representatives.
SECTION 4. Payment of expenses of the senate during the
interim between the 2025 and 2026 regular sessions shall be made
only with the approval of the president of the senate, and
payment of expenses of the house of representatives during the
interim between the 2025 and 2026 regular sessions shall be made
only with the approval of the speaker of the house of
representatives.
SECTION 5. Before January 21, 2026, the senate and the
house of representatives shall each have their accounts audited,
and a full report of the respective audits shall be presented to
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO. 1440
H.D. 1
the senate and house of representatives convening on
January 21, 2026.
SECTION 6. Unless otherwise prescribed by law, the
expenses of any member of the legislature while traveling abroad
on official business of the legislature shall be $145 a day as
authorized by the president of the senate and speaker of the
house of representatives.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,761,208 or so much
thereof as may be necessary to the office of the auditor for the
following expenses:
(1) The sum of $3,611,208 for defraying the expenses of
the office of the auditor during fiscal year
2025-2026; and
(2) The sum of $150,000 during fiscal year 2025-2026 for:
(A) Performing special studies;
(B) Improving capabilities for planning, programming,
and budgeting;
(C) Fulfilling other special requests made of the
auditor by the legislature or jointly by the
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO 5

Page 6 H.B. NO. 1440
H.D. 1
president of the senate and the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(D) Legislative studies and contractual services for
those studies; and
(E) Such other purposes as may be determined by the
joint action of the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives.
The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by
the auditor.
SECTION 8. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,800,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary to the office of the auditor during
fiscal year 2025-2026 to be deposited into the audit revolving
fund established pursuant to section 23-3.6, Hawaii Revised
Statutes.
SECTION 9. There is appropriated out of the audit
revolving fund the sum of $6,800,000 or so much thereof as may
be necessary to the office of the auditor during fiscal year
2025-2026 for the office to conduct or complete its audit
functions as provided by law.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the auditor.
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO 6
IMIIIIiHOMIilim

Page 7 H.B. NO. 1440
H.D. 1
SECTION 10. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,585,330 or so much
thereof as may be necessary to the legislative reference bureau
for defraying the expenses of the legislative reference bureau
during fiscal year 2025-2026, including equipment relating to
computer systems programming and operations.
The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by
the legislative reference bureau.
SECTION 11. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,669,017 or so much
thereof as may be necessary to the office of the ombudsman for
defraying the expenses of the office during fiscal year
2025-2026.
The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by
the ombudsman.
SECTION 12. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,679,759 or so much
thereof as may be necessary to the office of the state ethics
commission for defraying the expenses of the office during
fiscal year 2025-2026.
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO
HiHllllimiHlilllH

Page 8 H.B. NO. 1440
H.D. 1
The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by
the state ethics commission.
SECTION 13. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the following sums or so much
thereof as may be necessary to be expended for the purpose of
accrued vacation payments and vacation transfer payments for any
employee leaving the employ of the senate, house of
representatives, office of the auditor, legislative reference
bureau, office of the ombudsman, and state ethics commission:
Expending Agency Amount
Senate $245,000
House of Representatives $294,524
Office of the Auditor $68,106
Legislative Reference Bureau $100,780
Office of the Ombudsman $84,035
State Ethics Commission $16,553
provided that the appropriate expending agency shall first make
payments from the vacation payout allocation before expending
funds from turnover and vacancy amounts; and provided further
that any unexpended funds shall lapse to the general fund on
June 30, 2026.
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO

Page 9 H.B. NO. 1440
H.D. 1
SECTION 14. As of the close of business on June 30, 2026,
the unexpended or unencumbered balance of any appropriation made
by this Act shall lapse into the general fund,
SECTION 15. Each section of this Act is declared to be
severable from the remainder of this Act.
SECTION 16. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
APPROVED this 12th Jgy of March , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
2025-1349 HB1440 HDl HMSO 9

HB No. 1440, HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: February 7, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: FEB 2? 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate